src/fst/stems/particles_newwords.lexc
LEXICON PCLE_NEWWORDS
test:test N_MUORR "(eng) /(fin) /(rus) " ;
!! ADD PARTICLES BELOW



!! CODED BY EINO AND JASKA


a+Pcle:a PCLE_ "::1000::ordId::8290::" ;
amâ+Pcle:amâ PCLE_ "::1000::ordId::2430::" ;
ât+Pcle:ât PCLE_ "::1000::ordId::2430::" ;

ges+Pcle:ges # ;
joo+Pcle:joo # ; ! from a song

!! Lemmas:stems undesignated 2015-03-06
!! These have been commented out 2015-11-13
!maaʹliu:maaʹliu WORK_ "::1000::ordId::26914::" ;
!ǩiisa:ǩiisa WORK_ "::1000::ordId::11190::" ;
!a:a WORK_ "::1000::ordId::1691|15068::" ;
!ai:ai WORK_ "::1000::ordId::3432::" ;
!amen:amen WORK_ "::1000::ordId::16::" ;
!arggpeeiʹvi:arggpeeiʹvi WORK_ "::1000::ordId::843::" ;
!avi:avi WORK_ "::1000::ordId::23896::" ;
!aǥu:aǥu WORK_ "::1000::ordId::5033::" ;
!aʹppja:aʹppja WORK_ "::1000::ordId::26430::" ;
!aʹppjest:aʹppjest WORK_ "::1000::ordId::26428::" ;
!ba:ba WORK_ "::1000::ordId::14244::" ;
!beâddaa:beâdˈdaa INTERJ_ "::1000::ordId::28761::" ;
!beälla:beälla WORK_ "::1000::ordId::18734::" ;
!beäʹlnn:beäʹlnn WORK_ "::1000::ordId::18736::" ;
!blouslõõveeʹl:blouslõõveeʹl GER-MANNER_ "::1000::ordId::22333::" ;
!ce:ce WORK_ "::1000::ordId::21624::" ;
!cirgg:cirgg INTERJ_ "::1000::ordId::20981::" ;
!coolpeälak:coolpeälak WORK_ "::1000::ordId::9174::" ;
!davai:davai WORK_ "::1000::ordId::9533::" ;
!de:de WORK_ "::1000::ordId::14883|4777|22321|22321::" ;
!deʹbe:deʹbe WORK_ "::1000::ordId::2430|5850::" ;
!deʹbet:deʹbet WORK_ "::1000::ordId::2430::" ;
!dimâʹmmet:dimâʹmmet WORK_ "::1000::ordId::23262::" ;
!diǥo:diǥo WORK_ "::1000::ordId::14897::" ;
!diǥu:diǥu WORK_ "::1000::ordId::9166|4291::" ;
!dno.:dno. WORK_ "::1000::ordId::4929::" ;
!domoi:domoi WORK_ "::1000::ordId::8980::" ;
!dotomo:dotomo INTERJ_ "::1000::ordId::19230::" ;
!duŋ:duŋ WORK_ "::1000::ordId::18676::" ;
!duŋk:duŋk WORK_ "::1000::ordId::12222::" ;
!däs:däs WORK_ "::1000::ordId::23865|23863::" ;
!däs-i:däs-i WORK_ "::1000::ordId::23866::" ;
!dääram:dääram WORK_ "::1000::ordId::4325::" ;
!dääras:dääras WORK_ "::1000::ordId::4325::" ;
!dååma:dååma WORK_ "::1000::ordId::9021::" ;
!dååtlas:dååtlas WORK_ "::1000::ordId::::" ;
!eejjadiʹʒʒe:eejjadiʹʒʒe WORK_ "::1000::ordId::27418::" ;
!eeuʹnǩani:eeuʹnǩani WORK_ "::1000::ordId::29208::" ;
!eežža:eežža WORK_ "::1000::ordId::33957|157::" ;
!eeʹjjediʹʒʒe:eeʹjjediʹʒʒe WORK_ "::1000::ordId::27416::" ;
!eeʹjjesiʹʒʒe:eeʹjjesiʹʒʒe WORK_ "::1000::ordId::27414::" ;
!eeʹđeld:eeʹđeld WORK_ "::1000::ordId::27::" ;
!eeʹđes:eeʹđes WORK_ "::1000::ordId::26::" ;
!eeʹđääld:eeʹđääld WORK_ "::1000::ordId::26::" ;
!eeʹžža:eeʹžža WORK_ "::1000::ordId::8373::" ;
!eiʹdde:eiʹdde WORK_ "::1000::ordId::5303::" ;
!eiʹddvââ:eiʹddvââ WORK_ "::1000::ordId::27101|3980::" ;
!eiʹddvââ-ni:eiʹddvââ-ni WORK_ "::1000::ordId::5304::" ;
!eiʹddvââ:eiʹddvââ WORK_ "::1000::ordId::5304::" ;
!eččad:eččad WORK_ "::1000::ordId::::" ;
!eččam:eččam WORK_ "::1000::ordId::4678::" ;
!eʹčč-mij:eʹčč-mij WORK_ "::1000::ordId::4677::" ;
!ga:ga WORK_ "::1000::ordId::5649::" ;
!hahh:hahh WORK_ "::1000::ordId::2182::" ;
!heävašviõǥǥin:heävašviõǥǥin WORK_ "::1000::ordId::3126::" ;
!hoʹhss:hoʹhss INTERJ_ "::1000::ordId::3713::" ;
!håt-i:håt-i WORK_ "::1000::ordId::27016::" ;
!håʹt:håʹt WORK_ "::1000::ordId::27013|23876::" ;
!håʹt-i:håʹt-i WORK_ "::1000::ordId::27013::" ;
!i:i WORK_ "::1000::ordId::2430|5300::" ;
!ij-a:ij-a WORK_ "::1000::ordId::1429::" ;
!ij-ǥa:ij-ǥa WORK_ "::1000::ordId::1428::" ;
!ijǥõl:ijǥõl WORK_ "::1000::ordId::1443::" ;
!iǥâ:iǥâ WORK_ "::1000::ordId::1443::" ;
!iǥõl:iǥõl WORK_ "::1000::ordId::1443::" ;
!iʹlleʹjje:iʹlleʹjje WORK_ "::1000::ordId::1426::" ;
!iʹlleʹčče:iʹlleʹčče WORK_ "::1000::ordId::1426::" ;
!iʹlleʹžže:iʹlleʹžže WORK_ "::1000::ordId::1426::" ;
!ja:ja WORK_ "::1000::ordId::4777::" ;
!jaa:jaa WORK_ "::1000::ordId::4779::" ;
!jeeʹrab:jeeʹrab WORK_ "::1000::ordId::1764::" ;
!jeeʹresårra:jeeʹresårra WORK_ "::1000::ordId::14257::" ;
!jeeʹresåʹrnn:jeeʹresåʹrnn WORK_ "::1000::ordId::14256::" ;
!jeä:jeä WORK_ "::1000::ordId::1430::" ;
!jeä-ǥa:jeä-ǥa WORK_ "::1000::ordId::1434::" ;
!jeällap:jeällap WORK_ "::1000::ordId::29744::" ;
!jeällaz:jeällaz WORK_ "::1000::ordId::29745::" ;
!jeänaš:jeänaš WORK_ "::1000::ordId::1621::" ;
!jeänmõsân:jeänmõsân WORK_ "::1000::ordId::1621|1622|1623::" ;
!jeännadiʹʒʒe:jeännadiʹʒʒe WORK_ "::1000::ordId::29704::" ;
!jeännam:jeännam WORK_ "::1000::ordId::29702::" ;
!jeännamiʹʒʒe:jeännamiʹʒʒe WORK_ "::1000::ordId::29701::" ;
!jeäʹl:jeäʹl WORK_ "::1000::ordId::29742::" ;
!jeäʹl-ǥa:jeäʹl-ǥa WORK_ "::1000::ordId::29746::" ;
!jeäʹled:jeäʹled WORK_ "::1000::ordId::29743::" ;
!jeäʹleeʹstes:jeäʹleeʹstes WORK_ "::1000::ordId::1577::" ;
!jeäʹlä:jeäʹlä WORK_ "::1000::ordId::1431::" ;
!jeäʹläm:jeäʹläm WORK_ "::1000::ordId::1433::" ;
!jeäʹlämma:jeäʹlämma WORK_ "::1000::ordId::1433::" ;
!jeäʹlääm:jeäʹlääm WORK_ "::1000::ordId::1433::" ;
!jeäʹnben:jeäʹnben WORK_ "::1000::ordId::1608::" ;
!jeäʹp:jeäʹp WORK_ "::1000::ordId::1435::" ;
!jeäʹp-ǥa:jeäʹp-ǥa WORK_ "::1000::ordId::1436::" ;
!jeäʹped:jeäʹped WORK_ "::1000::ordId::1441::" ;
!jie:jie WORK_ "::1000::ordId::1430::" ;
!jie-ǥa:jie-ǥa WORK_ "::1000::ordId::1434::" ;
!jielä:jielä WORK_ "::1000::ordId::1431::" ;
!jieʹl:jieʹl WORK_ "::1000::ordId::29742::" ;
!jieʹlled:jieʹlled WORK_ "::1000::ordId::29743::" ;
!jieʹnnesiʹʒʒe:jieʹnnesiʹʒʒe WORK_ "::1000::ordId::27415::" ;
!jiiʹjjesmiõlin:jiiʹjjesmiõlin WORK_ "::1000::ordId::15940::" ;
!jiânnai:jiânnai WORK_ "::1000::ordId::16648::" ;
!jiântta:jiântta WORK_ "::1000::ordId::27079|29800::" ;
!jiõggmäärdain:jiõggmäärdain WORK_ "::1000::ordId::3002::" ;
!jiõggääʹppest:jiõggääʹppest WORK_ "::1000::ordId::3002::" ;
!jiʹhttel:jiʹhttel WORK_ "::1000::ordId::178::" ;
!joba:joba WORK_ "::1000::ordId::5032::" ;
!joo:joo WORK_ "::1000::ordId::5030::" ;
!jorddmõššân:jorddmõššân WORK_ "::1000::ordId::28617::" ;
!jos:jos WORK_ "::1000::ordId::5033::" ;
!ju:ju WORK_ "::1000::ordId::2430::" ;
!jåått:jåått WORK_ "::1000::ordId::2490::" ;
!jåʹttlubun:jåʹttlubun WORK_ "::1000::ordId::15135::" ;
!jåʹttlânji:jåʹttlânji WORK_ "::1000::ordId::15140::" ;
!jõs:jõs WORK_ "::1000::ordId::5033::" ;
!ka:ka WORK_ "::1000::ordId::6555|5649::" ;
!kleess:kleess WORK_ "::1000::ordId::15697::" ;
!kokkas:kokkas WORK_ "::1000::ordId::6824::" ;
!kookkas:kookkas WORK_ "::1000::ordId::1988::" ;
!koon-a:koon-a WORK_ "::1000::ordId::30112::" ;
!koortâst:koortâst WORK_ "::1000::ordId::8849::" ;
!koummčueʹđ:koummčueʹđ WORK_ "::1000::ordId::8544::" ;
!koʹlmmešt:koʹlmmešt WORK_ "::1000::ordId::8545::" ;
!kroota:kroota WORK_ "::1000::ordId::29720|29373::" ;
!krootjanja:krootjanja WORK_ "::1000::ordId::29720::" ;
!kruuʹta:kruuʹta WORK_ "::1000::ordId::29720|29373::" ;
!krååʹma:krååʹma WORK_ "::1000::ordId::4335::" ;
!ku:ku WORK_ "::1000::ordId::9485|9165::" ;
!kueiʹtsâjja:kueiʹtsâjja WORK_ "::1000::ordId::5834::" ;
!kueiʹtvuässas:kueiʹtvuässas WORK_ "::1000::ordId::16100::" ;
!kueiʹtårra:kueiʹtårra WORK_ "::1000::ordId::23230::" ;
!kueʹhtt-tääv:kueʹhtt-tääv WORK_ "::1000::ordId::29979::" ;
!kueʹhttčueʹđ:kueʹhttčueʹđ WORK_ "::1000::ordId::5965::" ;
!kueʹmeš:kueʹmeš WORK_ "::1000::ordId::9455::" ;
!kueʹssest:kueʹssest WORK_ "::1000::ordId::28175::" ;
!kuhttže:kuhttže WORK_ "::1000::ordId::9475::" ;
!kujo:kujo WORK_ "::1000::ordId::7282|8918::" ;
!kukkuu:kukkuu INTERJ_ "::1000::ordId::9261::" ;
!kukurikuu:kukurikuu INTERJ_ "::1000::ordId::9251::" ;
!kuttõõlǩani:kuttõõlǩani WORK_ "::1000::ordId::183::" ;
!kuullmest:kuullmest WORK_ "::1000::ordId::9933::" ;
!kuuʹǩǩ:kuuʹǩǩ WORK_ "::1000::ordId::6821::" ;
!kuuʹǩǩab:kuuʹǩǩab WORK_ "::1000::ordId::6822::" ;
!kuuʹǩǩben:kuuʹǩǩben WORK_ "::1000::ordId::17887::" ;
!kuuʹǩǩbõʹžže:kuuʹǩǩbõʹžže WORK_ "::1000::ordId::6829::" ;
!kuvddân:kuvddân WORK_ "::1000::ordId::2327::" ;
!kuâhttast:kuâhttast WORK_ "::1000::ordId::5802|5954|5961|5803|5956::" ;
!kuâmmaniʒʒe:kuâmmaniʒʒe WORK_ "::1000::ordId::9455::" ;
!kuâssa:kuâssa WORK_ "::1000::ordId::10152::" ;
!kuâđđra:kuâđđra WORK_ "::1000::ordId::13490|8371::" ;
!kuâŋŋ:kuâŋŋ WORK_ "::1000::ordId::28190::" ;
!kuâŋŋad:kuâŋŋad WORK_ "::1000::ordId::28198|15685::" ;
!kuâŋŋsest:kuâŋŋsest WORK_ "::1000::ordId::20146::" ;
!kuälmadlåkka:kuälmadlåkka WORK_ "::1000::ordId::8539::" ;
!kuälmeešt:kuälmeešt WORK_ "::1000::ordId::8535::" ;
!kuäskadiʹʒʒe:kuäskadiʹʒʒe WORK_ "::1000::ordId::26245::" ;
!kuäʹmmertiudd:kuäʹmmertiudd WORK_ "::1000::ordId::9060::" ;
!kuäʹrŋjpeälla:kuäʹrŋjpeälla WORK_ "::1000::ordId::10083::" ;
!kuäʹss:kuäʹss WORK_ "::1000::ordId::13813::" ;
!kuäʹss-a:kuäʹss-a WORK_ "::1000::ordId::9333::" ;
!kuåsttamaž:kuåsttam WORK_ "::1000::ordId::19411::" ;
!kuåsttmaž:kuåsttm WORK_ "::1000::ordId::19411::" ;
!kuõiʹtbeälla:kuõiʹtbeälla WORK_ "::1000::ordId::5955|5801::" ;
!kuõiʹtbeäʹl:kuõiʹtbeäʹl WORK_ "::1000::ordId::5959|5955|5801::" ;
!kuõiʹtbeäʹlnn:kuõiʹtbeäʹlnn WORK_ "::1000::ordId::5955|5801::" ;
!kuõiʹteeʹl:kuõiʹteeʹl WORK_ "::1000::ordId::5802|5954|5961|5803|5956::" ;
!kuõiʹtes:kuõiʹtes WORK_ "::1000::ordId::5961|5803|5956::" ;
!kuõiʹtpeälla:kuõiʹtpeälla WORK_ "::1000::ordId::13900::" ;
!kuõiʹtpeäʹl:kuõiʹtpeäʹl WORK_ "::1000::ordId::13902::" ;
!kuõiʹtpeäʹlnn:kuõiʹtpeäʹlnn WORK_ "::1000::ordId::13901::" ;
!kuõʹhttešt:kuõʹhttešt WORK_ "::1000::ordId::5957::" ;
!kuʹttešt:kuʹttešt WORK_ "::1000::ordId::9898::" ;
!kuʹǩǩen:kuʹǩǩen WORK_ "::1000::ordId::1986::" ;
!kâkkvââ:kâkkvââ WORK_ "::1000::ordId::9169::" ;
!kâllsanji:kâllsanji WORK_ "::1000::ordId::10095::" ;
!kâskka:kâskka WORK_ "::1000::ordId::7360::" ;
!kââllas:kââllas WORK_ "::1000::ordId::10094::" ;
!kâʹl:kâʹl WORK_ "::1000::ordId::10092|25260::" ;
!kâʹl-ǥu:kâʹl-ǥu WORK_ "::1000::ordId::25198::" ;
!kâʹll?:kâʹll? WORK_ "::1000::ordId::13945::" ;
!kâʹllǥu:kâʹllǥu WORK_ "::1000::ordId::8908::" ;
!kääuceen:kääuceen WORK_ "::1000::ordId::5792::" ;
!käʹhccešt:käʹhccešt WORK_ "::1000::ordId::5788::" ;
!kõskkneez:kõskkneez WORK_ "::1000::ordId::7366::" ;
!kõõskrääʹjest:kõõskrääʹjest WORK_ "::1000::ordId::7364::" ;
!kõõskâst:kõõskâst WORK_ "::1000::ordId::7381::" ;
!kõõumâs:kõõumâs WORK_ "::1000::ordId::24005::" ;
!kõʹsǩǩe:kõʹsǩǩe WORK_ "::1000::ordId::7375::" ;
!leiʹǧǧ:leiʹǧǧ WORK_ "::1000::ordId::11700::" ;
!lekkan:lekkan WORK_ "::1000::ordId::15991::" ;
!leâša:leâša WORK_ "::1000::ordId::27013::" ;
!leša:leša WORK_ "::1000::ordId::27013|22146|21105::" ;
!loonad:loonad WORK_ "::1000::ordId::12487::" ;
!loonnan:loonnan WORK_ "::1000::ordId::12487::" ;
!looppbeälla:looppbeälla WORK_ "::1000::ordId::12256::" ;
!looppbeäʹlnn:looppbeäʹlnn WORK_ "::1000::ordId::12255::" ;
!looppâst:looppâst WORK_ "::1000::ordId::12239::" ;
!looǥǥkanai:looǥǥkanai WORK_ "::1000::ordId::12378::" ;
!luuzz:luuzz WORK_ "::1000::ordId::12772::" ;
!luzz:luzz WORK_ "::1000::ordId::12506|12772::" ;
!luʹnn:luʹnn WORK_ "::1000::ordId::12771::" ;
!lââʹssen:lââʹssen WORK_ "::1000::ordId::11972::" ;
!lååimeʹt:lååimeʹt WORK_ "::1000::ordId::10158::" ;
!lååǥǥkani:lååǥǥkani WORK_ "::1000::ordId::12380::" ;
!lååʹtt:lååʹtt WORK_ "::1000::ordId::7743::" ;
!mana:mana WORK_ "::1000::ordId::8908::" ;
!mieʹldd:mieʹldd WORK_ "::1000::ordId::14010|17342::" ;
!mieʹtt:mieʹtt WORK_ "::1000::ordId::14397::" ;
!miõllstes:miõllstes WORK_ "::1000::ordId::13749::" ;
!miõlstan:miõlstan PRON_ "::1000::ordId::13737::" ;
!mâka:mâka WORK_ "::1000::ordId::14009::" ;
!mââibeälla:mââibeälla WORK_ "::1000::ordId::17342|24049|23857|5410::" ;
!mââibeäʹl:mââibeäʹl WORK_ "::1000::ordId::24053|24009::" ;
!mââibeäʹlnn:mââibeäʹlnn WORK_ "::1000::ordId::17331|17337|24030|5410::" ;
!mâʹhtt:mâʹhtt WORK_ "::1000::ordId::9166::" ;
!mâʹmmet:mâʹmmet WORK_ "::1000::ordId::13806::" ;
!mâʹt-a:mâʹt-a WORK_ "::1000::ordId::9843::" ;
!mâʹta:mâʹta WORK_ "::1000::ordId::9166::" ;
!mâʹte:mâʹte WORK_ "::1000::ordId::9166|9843|4291::" ;
!mâʹŋŋlasas:mâʹŋŋlasas WORK_ "::1000::ordId::5414|23855::" ;
!mâʹŋŋlõõssâs:mâʹŋŋlõõssâs WORK_ "::1000::ordId::23855::" ;
!määiʹnest:määiʹnest WORK_ "::1000::ordId::24067|28878::" ;
!määttest:määttest WORK_ "::1000::ordId::9384::" ;
!mäʹhtt:mäʹhtt WORK_ "::1000::ordId::9168::" ;
!mååžna:mååžna WORK_ "::1000::ordId::13183::" ;
!naa:naa WORK_ "::1000::ordId::10093::" ;
